Wyoming, session 2025, SF0065.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 9-21-201 and 9-21-202 are created to
read:

ARTICLE 2
DATA PRIVACY-GOVERNMENT ENTITIES

SF0065

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0088
9-21-201. Definitions.

(a) As used in this article:

(i) "Deidentified data" means data that cannot
reasonably be used to infer information about, or otherwise
be linked to, an identified or identifiable natural person
or personal digital identity or a device linked to a
natural person or personal digital identity, if the
government entity that possesses the data takes reasonable
measures to ensure the data cannot be associated with a
natural person or personal digital identity;

(ii) "Government entity" means the state and all
its political subdivisions, agencies, instrumentalities and
institutions and any local government entity. "Government
entity" shall not include the judicial branch of government
or any law enforcement agency in Wyoming;

(iii) "Identified or identifiable natural
person" means a natural person who can be readily
identified, directly or indirectly, by reference to an
SF0065

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0088
identifier such as a name, an identification number,
specific geolocation data or an online identifier;

(iv) "Law enforcement agency" means a county,
municipal, college or university police force, Wyoming
highway patrol, the division of criminal investigation, the
department of corrections or any state or local agency or
political subdivision or part of an agency or political
subdivision to the extent that the primary purpose of the
agency or political subdivision, or part thereof, is the
prevention or investigation of crime or the enforcement of
penal, traffic, regulatory or criminal laws. "Law
enforcement agency" shall not include the office of any
city, county or district attorney or other division of the
attorney general;

(v) "Personal data" means information that is
linked or reasonably linkable to an identified or
identifiable natural person or personal digital identity
and does not include deidentified data;

(vi) "Personal digital identity" means as
defined in W.S. 8-1-102(a)(xviii).
SF0065

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0088

9-21-202. Limitations on personal data by government
entities; conflict of laws.

(a) No government entity shall purchase, sell, trade
or transfer personal data without the express written
consent of the natural person except as otherwise expressly
provided by law and except that:

(i) A government entity may transfer personal
data to another government entity provided that the other
government entity complies with this article;

(ii) A government entity may petition the
elected governing person or body with direct authority over
the government entity for an exception to this subsection
on a case by case basis. The elected governing person or
body, in the elected governing person's or body's
discretion, may publicly approve in writing an exception to
this subsection not to exceed a term of two (2) years per
petition; and

SF0065

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0088
(iii) Nothing in this subsection shall be
construed to prohibit the transfer of personal data that is
otherwise compliant with the Health Insurance Portability
and Accountability Act or the Family Education Rights and
Privacy Act.

(b) Any Wyoming resident may request a copy of their
personal data from any government entity maintaining it.
The government entity may charge a fee for production of
the requested personal data consistent with fees authorized
to be charged under the Wyoming Public Records Act, W.S.
16-4-201 through 16-4-205.

(c) A Wyoming resident who objects to the accuracy,
completeness, pertinence, timeliness, relevance, retention,
dissemination or denial of access to the resident's own
personal data that is maintained by a government entity
may, individually or through a duly authorized
representative, file an objection with the government
entity that maintains the data. The government entity
maintaining the personal data shall, within sixty (60) days
of the receipt of an objection:

SF0065

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0088
(i) Investigate the validity of the objection;

(ii) If the objection is found to be meritorious
after investigation, alter the contents of, or the methods
for holding, or the dissemination or use of the personal
data, or delete or grant access to it;

(iii) If the objection is found to lack merit
after investigation, provide the resident the opportunity
to have a statement reflecting the resident's views
maintained and disseminated with the personal data in
question;

(iv) Notify the resident in writing of any
decision regarding the resident's objection.

(d) To the extent that a provision of this article
conflicts with another provision of state or federal law,
the other provision shall control.

Section 2. W.S. 9-21-203 is created to read:

SF0065

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0088
9-21-203. Personal data collection and retention by
government entities.

(a) In addition to the policies required under W.S.
9-21-101, if applicable, each government entity that
collects or retains personal data shall adopt, enforce and
maintain a policy regarding the collection, access,
retention, security and use of personal data consistent
with all applicable federal and state laws, including this
article.

(b) No government entity shall collect or maintain
more personal data than is reasonably necessary for the
performance of the government entity's lawful functions.
All personal data collected and maintained by government
entities shall be necessary for a specific pre-defined
purpose.

(c) No government entity shall maintain personal data
for longer than three (3) years without an express written
policy identifying the extended retention period and
providing a reasonable justification for the extended
retention period. Statutory retention requirements provided
SF0065

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0088
for in W.S. 9-2-405 through 9-2-413 constitute a reasonable
justification.

Section 3. Not later than January 1, 2026, the state
chief information officer in consultation with the state
archivist shall develop sample policies for use by state
agencies, counties, cities, towns and other political
subdivisions consistent with the requirements of this act.

Section 4. W.S. 9-2-203 as created by section 2 of
this act shall be effective as to counties, cities or towns
on July 1, 2027 and as to each political subdivision of the
state other than state agencies, counties, cities or towns
on July 1, 2028. All state agencies, counties, cities,
towns and other political subdivisions shall adopt any
necessary policies and procedures to meet the requirements
of this act.

SF0065

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0088
Section 5.

(a) Section 2 of this act is effective July 1, 2026.

(b) Sections 1, 3, 4 and 5 of this act are effective
immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a
bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of
the Wyoming Constitution.

(END)
SF0065